Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-604
Dogs; killing; when permitted.

Any person shall have the right to kill any dog found doing any damage as mentioned in sections 54-601 and 54-602 to any sheep or domestic animal, or if he shall have just and reasonable ground to believe that such dog has been killing, wounding, chasing or worrying such sheep or animal; and no action shall be maintained for such killing.

Laws 1877, § 4, p. 156;

R.S.1913, § 175;

C.S.1922, § 172;

C.S.1929, § 54-604;

R.S.1943, § 54-604.